Arkansas, session 2025, HB1936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-42-206(a), concerning nominating
petitions for municipal elections, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The city or town council of any city or town with the mayor-
council form of government may request the county party committees of
recognized political parties under the laws of the state to shall conduct
party primaries for municipal offices unless the governing body of the
municipality passes a resolution that the governing body will conduct
nonpartisan municipal elections for the forthcoming year by resolution passed
before August 31 of the calendar year before the election.
(2) The resolution shall remain in effect for the subsequent
elections two (2) years unless revoked by the city or town council.
(3)(A) When the a resolution has been adopted under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section, the clerk or recorder shall:
(i) Mail a certified copy of the resolution to the
chairs of the county party committees and to the chairs of the state party
committees; and
(ii) File a certified copy of the resolution with the
county clerk.
*SSS297*
03/31/2025 12:38:13 PM SSS297

HB1936
(B) The county clerk shall forward a copy of the certified
file-marked resolution to the county board of election commissioners.
(4) Candidates nominated for municipal office by political
primaries under this section shall be certified by the county party
committees to the county board of election commissioners and shall be placed
on the ballot at the general election.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-42-206(f), concerning nominating
petitions for municipal elections, is repealed.
(f) Nothing in this section shall repeal any law pertaining to the
city administrator form of government or the city manager form of government.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-47-109(d), concerning the election of
directors in a city manager form of government, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1) All regular and special elections of directors shall be
nonpartisan, the ballots to show no party designation.
(2) In all regular and special elections, each candidate for the
office of director shall be elected by the electors of the city at large.
(3)(2) A director shall not be prohibited from holding successive
terms of office.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-48-110(d), concerning the election of
mayors and directors in a city administrator form of government, is amended
to read as follows:
(d)(1) All primary, general, and special elections of the mayor and
directors shall be nonpartisan, and the ballots shall show no party
designation.
(2)(A) In all primary, general, and special elections, each
candidate for the office of mayor or director shall be elected by the
electors of the city as follows:
(i)(A) The persons elected to fill director
positions one, two, three, and four, respectively, shall be qualified
electors of the respective wards and shall be elected by the qualified
electors of the respective wards; and
(ii)(B) The persons elected to fill the position of
03/31/2025 12:38:13 PM SSS297

HB1936
mayor and director positions five, six, and seven, respectively, shall be
qualified electors of the city and shall be elected by the qualified electors
of the entire city.
(B)(2) Neither the mayor nor a director shall be
prohibited from holding successive terms of office.
(C)(i)(a)(3)(A)(i) The persons elected to fill director
positions one, two, three, and four, respectively, shall continue to reside
in the ward from which he or she was elected for the term for which he or she
was elected.
(b)(ii) The persons elected to fill the
position of mayor and director positions five, six, and seven, respectively,
shall continue to reside in the city from which he or she was elected for the
term for which he or she was elected.
(ii)(B) If a duly elected director shall cease to
reside in the ward or the city from which he or she was elected, the director
shall be disqualified to hold the office, and a vacancy shall exist that
shall be filled as prescribed by law.



















03/31/2025 12:38:13 PM SSS297